test_lexicon_with_loan_words.lexc
LEXICON Root
	Nouns;

LEXICON Nouns
jana End; ! ja-na
katosi End; ! ka-to-si
kasku End; 
naapurit End;
myrsky  End;
eversti End; ! e-vers-ti
täi  End;
epäily End;
puusto End;
avaruus End;
avain   End;
apu     End;
säie    End;
äsken   End;
kauan   End;
irstas  End;
aorta   End;
uoma    End;
vihreää End;
aatto   End;
taloaan End;
kissa End; ! kis-sa

! loanwords
prosentti End; ! pro-sent-ti
trendi	End; ! tren-di
flunssa End; ! fluns-sa
klaava	End; ! klaa-va
kraateri	End; ! kraa-te-ri
stressi	End; ! stres-si
sprinkleri	End; ! sprink-le-ri
hamstraaja	End; ! hams-traa-ja
maistraatti	End; ! mais-traat-ti
abstrakti	End; ! abs-trak-ti


! diftong weirdness
pienen	End;
karies	End;

! others from http://www.ling.helsinki.fi/~fkarlsso/Automatic_hyphenation.PDF
kiuas	End; ! kiu-as
liueta   End; ! liu-eta
liuote   End; ! liu-ote
oieta 	End ; ! oi-eta



0 End; 

LEXICON End
0:^  #; 


END
